Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 4. Coal Mine Refuse Impoundments and Retaining Dams.

§ 45.2-617.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Coal refuse”
means waste material resulting from the mining and screening or processing of coal.

“Coal slurry”
means waste water and impurities produced as the result of coal washing and preparation of coal for market, containing a combination of coal, shale, claystone, siltstone, sandstone, limestone, or related materials that are excavated, moved, and disposed of from underground workings.

“Mine refuse impoundment”
means a mine refuse pile that retains water that has been used in carrying out any part of the process necessary in the production or preparation of coal.

“Mine refuse pile”
means a pile of coarse or fine coal refuse that is a result of the mining or screening process that may be stacked, spread, or graded and covers 20 acre-feet or more.

“Operator”
means any person who operates, controls, or supervises a retaining dam or a mine refuse impoundment.

“Retaining dam”
means an artificial barrier or obstruction that is designed to impound water, coal slurry, or silt (i) to an elevation of five feet or more above the upstream toe of the structure and has a storage volume of 20 acre-feet or more or (ii) to an elevation of 20 feet or more measured at the open channel spillway or from the crest of the dam in a closed system, regardless of storage volume.

“Silt”
means fine particles resulting from a mining operation, suspended in or deposited by water.

“Water”
means liquid or slurry resulting from the processing of coal in mining operations.

History.

2005, c. 3, § 45.1-221.1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy shall promulgate, within 280 days of the enactment of this act, amendments to 4 VAC 25-130-816.11 requiring coal mine permit boundary markers located on steep slopes above private dwellings or other occupied buildings to be made or marked with fluorescent or reflective paint or material, and amendments to 4 VAC 25-130-816.64 requiring all persons conducting blasting operations on coal mines occurring within 1,000 feet of a private dwelling or occupied building to conduct seismic monitoring of the blasting.”

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-618.
Design and construction of retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment; designs and other data to be submitted to Chief.

Any new retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, or the modification of an existing retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, shall be designed and constructed by or under the direction of a licensed professional engineer. Such requirement shall only apply to a mine refuse impoundment if it is designed to impound water, coal slurry, or silt (i) to an elevation of five feet or more above the upstream toe of the structure and has a storage volume of 20 acre-feet or more or (ii) to an elevation of 20 feet or more measured at the open channel spillway or from the crest of the dam in a closed system, regardless of storage volume. The design, construction specifications, and other related data, including final abandonment plans for such retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, shall be certified by the licensed professional engineer.

No person shall place, construct, enlarge, alter, repair, remove, or abandon any retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment until the operator has filed an application for and received approval from the Chief for such construction or modification. However, routine repairs that do not affect the engineering design criteria or safety of an approved retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment are not subject to such application and approval requirements.

History.

1974, c. 323, § 45.1-222; 1984, c. 590; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to definition of impounding structure, see § 10.1-604.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-619.
Examination of retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment; potentially hazardous condition; plans to be submitted by operators.

Each retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment shall be examined by an authorized person, as defined in §

45.2-501

, at least every seven days or as otherwise approved by the Chief. Each such retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment shall be examined for compliance with approved design and maintenance requirements, visible structural weakness, volume overload, and other hazards.

After each examination, the authorized person, as defined in §

45.2-501

, shall promptly record the results of the examination in a book that shall be available at the retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, or other designated location, for inspection by the Chief or his authorized representative. Each examination record shall include a description of any potentially hazardous condition found and any action taken to abate such potentially hazardous condition. Each record shall be countersigned by the supervisor of the authorized person creating the record. If such record discloses a potentially hazardous condition, the countersigning of the record shall be performed no later than the end of the next regularly scheduled working shift following the shift for which the examination was completed, and the person countersigning shall ensure that actions to eliminate or control the potentially hazardous condition have been taken. The operator of the retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment may authorize a person who possesses authority equivalent to that of the supervisor to act in the supervisor’s temporary absence to read and countersign the record and ensure that action is taken to eliminate the potentially hazardous condition disclosed in the record.

When rising water, coal slurry, or silt reaches 80 percent by volume of the safe design capacity of a retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, the examination required by subsection A shall be made more often as required by the Chief or his authorized representative.

When a potentially hazardous condition exists, the operator shall immediately initiate procedures to:

Remove all persons from the area that can reasonably be expected to be affected by the potentially hazardous condition;

Eliminate the potentially hazardous condition; and

Notify the Chief and other governing agencies by the quickest available means following the protocol established in the site’s emergency notification and evacuation plan pursuant to §

45.2-620

.

The operator of each coal site on which a retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment is located shall submit a plan for carrying out the requirements of §

45.2-618

and subsections A through D for approval by the Chief. The plan shall include:

The designs, construction specifications, and other related data required pursuant to §

45.2-618

;

A schedule and procedures for inspection of the retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment by a qualified person under normal conditions and under conditions that could cause flooding;

Procedures for evaluating a potentially hazardous condition;

Procedures for removing all persons from the area that can reasonably be expected to be affected by the potentially hazardous condition;

Procedures for eliminating the potentially hazardous condition;

Procedures for notifying the Chief and other governing agencies; and

Any additional information that may be required by the Chief.

Before making any changes or modifications in the approved plan, the operator shall obtain approval of such changes or modifications from the Chief.

The Chief shall notify the operator in writing whether the operator’s plan is approved or disapproved. If the Chief disapproves the plan, he shall provide the operator with his written objections thereto and his required amendments.

History.

1974, c. 323, § 45.1-224; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-620.
Emergency notification and evacuation plan.

On or before July 1 of each year, the operator of any retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment that meets the criteria of subsection A of §

45.2-618

shall submit to the Chief an emergency notification and evacuation plan. If there are no changes to a plan at the time the updated plan is due, the operator may submit a notice that there are no changes to the plan in lieu of submitting an updated plan to the Chief.

The plan and attendant maps, appropriate for the level of hazard of the retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, shall describe the retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment and shall include:

The name and address of the operator owning, operating, or controlling the structure;

The identification numbers of the structure as assigned by the Chief, MSHA, and the Office of Surface Mining;

The location of the structure indicated on (i) a current United States Geological Survey 7.5-minute or 15-minute topographic quadrangle map, (ii) an equivalent digital map, or (iii) a topographic map of a scale approved by the Chief;

The name and size in acres of the watershed in which the structure is located;

A description of the physical and engineering properties of the foundation materials on which the structure is to be or was constructed;

The location of existing or proposed instrumentation;

A statement of the runoff attributable to the probable maximum precipitation of six-hour duration and the calculations used in determining such runoff;

A statement of the runoff attributable to the storm for which the structure is designed and the calculations used in determining such runoff;

The location of any surface or underground coal mine, including the depth and extent of such workings, under and within 1,000 feet around the perimeter of the retaining dam or mine refuse impoundment, and the area of impounded material, shown at a scale not to exceed one inch equals 1,000 feet;

A map depicting the impoundment area and downstream and adjacent drainways, streambeds, roads, structures, and other public areas that could be affected if an accident were to occur at the impoundment. The map shall be at a scale not to exceed one inch equals 1,000 feet;

The names of persons who are familiar with the plan protocols and can take actions necessary to eliminate the hazard and minimize the impact to miners, the community, and the environment;

A location where a command and communication center could be established for the company team and emergency response personnel to report during an impoundment event;

The location of potential evacuation centers where affected parties could take shelter during an impoundment event;

An emergency contact list for agencies that would respond to an impoundment event; and

A list of miners employed at the site and businesses, community buildings, residences, and other occupied buildings within the impact zone that could be affected by an impoundment event, or other effective means of identifying such impact zone.

History.

2005, c. 3, § 45.1-224.1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”